Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5871.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to designate January 30 of each year as Fred Korematsu Day, March 31 of each year as Cesar E. Chavez Day, Farm Workers Day, July 14 of each year as President Gerald R. Ford Day, and July 30 of each year as Henry Ford Day. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes the fundamental contribution that Cesar E. Chavez the United Farm Workers of America made to this nation by organizing farm workers to campaign for safe and fair working conditions, reasonable wages, decent housing, and the outlawing of child labor. Cesar E. Chavez began working in the fields of Arizona and California at the age of 10. Profoundly influenced by these humble beginnings, Chavez The United Farm Workers of America, as a group, embraced the nonviolent principles of Mohandas Gandhi and Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., to crusade against racial and economic discrimination, coordinate voter registration drives, and found the united farm workers of America. In 1994, Chavez was posthumously awarded the presidential Medal of Freedom, the highest honor given to civilians by the United States government. In memory of this great American, secure employment conditions and benefits that farm workers deserve. In recognition of the tremendous efforts of the members of the United Farm Workers of America, the legislature declares that March 31 of each year shall be known as "Cesar E. Chavez Day"."Farm Workers Day". (2) The legislature encourages each individual in the great state of Michigan to pause on Cesar E. Chavez day and reflect upon the courage and sacrifice of a man Robert Kennedy once referred to as "one of the heroic figures of our time".Farm Workers Day and reflect upon the courage and sacrifice of those who feed us, especially those working within our state.